California statutes. Water Code
The board shall:

(a) Employ and appoint such agents, officers, and employees as may be required.

(b) Prescribe their duties and fix their salaries.

(c) Prescribe other terms and conditions of employment.

Subject to policies and standards established by the board, the board may delegate the powers specified in this section to any officer or employee of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ELECTIONS [35003. - 35288.]



  CHAPTER 1. Elections Generally [35003. - 35060.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [35003. - 35006.]

35003.

Each voter shall have one vote for each dollar’s worth of land to which he or she holds title. The last equalized assessment book of the district is conclusive evidence of ownership and of the value of the land so owned except that in the event that an assessment for a district shall not have been made and levied for the year in which the election is held, the last assessment roll of each affected county shall be used in lieu of the assessment book of the district as evidence of ownership. However, the board may determine by resolution that the assessment book or assessment roll of each affected county shall be corrected to reflect, in the case of transfers of land, those persons who as of the 45th day prior to the election appear as owners on the records of the county. If an equalized assessment book of the district does not exist, then each voter shall be entitled to cast one vote for each acre owned by the voter within the district, provided that if the voter owns less than one acre then the voter shall be entitled to one vote and any fraction shall be rounded to the nearest full acre.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1003, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35003.1.

A district may, by ordinance adopted at least 90 days prior to any district election, determine that voters shall thereafter be ascertained pursuant to this section.

In that event, the county elections official shall prepare the voter list required by Section 10525 of the Elections Code based upon the last equalized assessment roll of each affected county corrected to reflect, in the case of transfers of land, those persons who as of the 45th day prior to the election appear as owners on the records in the office of the county assessor which the assessor will use to prepare the next ensuing equalized assessment roll and which shall be conclusive evidence of ownership and of the value of land so owned. Where only a portion of a parcel of land has been transferred, and the assessed value thereof and of the remaining parcel are not separately stated upon the roll, estimated assessed values therefor shall be made by the county assessor, and the estimates shall, for the purposes of this section, be considered the value of the land. If more than one person or entity are shown as the owners of record of a parcel of land, the county elections official shall apportion the voting rights between the owners based upon the respective record interests in the information with respect thereto as the county elections official deems correct, proper, and appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 242.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35004.

Every voter, or his legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person duly appointed as his proxy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

35005.

No appointment of a proxy shall be valid, accepted, or vote allowed thereon at any district election unless it meets all of the following requirements:

(a) It is in writing.

(b) It is executed by the person or legal representative of the person who, in accordance with the provisions of Sections 35003 or 35003.1 is entitled to the votes for which the proxy is given.

(c) It is acknowledged or certified in accordance with Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) It specifies the election at which it is to be used. An appointment of a proxy shall be used only at the election specified.

(e) It shall be on a form as specified by the county elections official meeting the above requirements.

Every appointment of a proxy is revocable at the pleasure of the person executing it at any time before the person appointed as proxy shall have cast a ballot representing the votes for which the appointment was given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 162.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35006.

Before a legal representative votes at a district election he shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Establishment of Divisions [35025. - 35031.]

35025.

Each district may be divided into as many divisions as there are directors of the district. The establishment of the divisions and the boundaries thereof shall be made by the board of supervisors, who shall make such division if requested by a resolution passed by a majority of the board of directors or upon a petition signed by a majority of eligible voters within the boundaries of the district. Said resolution or petition shall be filed with the board of supervisors at least 140 days before the next general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

35026.

Within 30 days after the filing of the petition or the resolution requesting the establishment of divisions with the board of supervisors, the board of supervisors shall hold a hearing and shall hear any evidence produced to establish the validity of the petition or resolution and such further evidence as may be necessary as to divide the district into divisions as nearly equal in area as may be practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

35027.

Within 10 days after said hearing, the board of supervisors, if they determine that the resolution or petition is valid, shall forthwith order the establishment of divisions in the district as nearly equal in area as may be practicable and shall file a copy of said order with the board of directors of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

35028.

After the entry of the order establishing divisions within a district, one director shall be elected from each division and shall be a holder of title to land therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

35029.

The entry of the order dividing the district into divisions shall not affect the term of any director until his term expires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

35030.

At least 80 days prior to the next general district election, the board shall designate the divisions from which directors shall be elected. The number designated shall equal the number of directors to be elected at that election. At the next succeeding general district election, the directors shall be elected from the remaining divisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

35031.

Divisions once established may be modified by the same procedure as herein set forth for establishing divisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Alternative Method of Conducting Elections [35040. - 35060.]

35040.

The voting procedure within a district shall be changed from that of a landowner voting district to that of a resident voting district at such time as the board of directors shall determine by a resolution adopted in conformity with the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35041.

Between January 1 and March 30 of each year, the secretary of the district shall inspect the assessable area within the district. At such time as at least 50 percent of the assessable area within the district is devoted to and developed for residential, industrial, or nonagricultural commercial use, or any combination thereof, such fact shall be certified to the board of directors by the secretary of the district. Any time after such certification the registered voters residing within the district may petition for a change in the voting procedure from a landowner voting district to a resident voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35042.

The petition shall be signed by not less than 25 percent of the registered voters who reside within the district, but shall contain a minimum of 25 signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35043.

The petition shall be substantially in the following form:

The secretary of the ____ Water District having heretofore certified to the board of directors of the district that at least 50 percent of the assessable area within the district is devoted to and developed for residential, industrial, or nonagricultural commercial use, or any combination thereof, the undersigned voters who reside within the boundaries of ____ Water District hereby petition the board of directors thereof to hold all elections on the basis of resident voting district, rather than a landowner voting district.DateSignatureAddress

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35044.

Duplicate copies of the petition form shall constitute one petition when filed. If the district is in more than one county, signatures shall be obtained on separate copies of the petition in each county so that such petitions shall contain the signature only of residents of the county in which the copy was circulated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35045.

Each petition shall be signed and dated by registered voters who reside within the district and shall show their residence address.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35046.

Each page of the petition which contains the signature of one or more registered voters shall show thereon the affidavit of the circulator in the following form:

The undersigned circulator of the above petition hereby declares under penalty of perjury that the circulator of this petition was over the age of 18 years, and that the signatures hereon are the signatures of the persons named and were signed in the presence of the circulator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35047.

All signatures on the petition shall be obtained within the six-month period immediately preceding the filing thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35048.

The petition shall be filed with the county elections official of the principal county at least six months prior to the date of the next general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 163.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35049.

The signatures to the petition shall be verified as follows:

(a) If the district is wholly in one county, the county elections official shall examine the signatures and from the records of registration ascertain whether or not the petition is signed by the requisite number of registered voters.

(b) If the district is situated in more than one county, each county elections official shall examine that portion of the petition bearing
 signatures obtained in that county and from the records of registration ascertain the number of signatures of registered voters in that portion of the district lying in that county. The county elections official of a county other than the principal county shall prepare a certificate, and file the same with the county elections official of the principal county, showing the number of valid signatures of registered voters in that county who signed the petition, and shall also show the total number of registered voters in that county within the district on the date of filing the petition.

(c) The county elections official of the principal county shall attach to the petition a certificate showing the total number of valid signatures thereon, and the total number of registered voters within the district as of the date of filing the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 164.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35050.

If the number of signatures is not sufficient, a supplemental petition, in the form of a duplicate petition, but bearing additional signatures, may be filed with the county elections official of the principal county within 10 days from the date on which the county elections official of the principal county certified the results of the examination. The supplemental petition shall be verified in the same manner as the original petition. If the signatures on the petition are still insufficient, no action shall be taken thereon. The petition shall remain on file as a
 public record and failure to secure sufficient signatures shall not prejudice the later filing of an entirely new petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35051.

If the petition contains at least 25 valid signatures and if the total number of valid signatures on the petition constitutes 25 percent or more of the registered voters within the district as of the date of filing the petition, the county elections official of the principal county shall prepare a certificate to that effect, attach the same to the petition, and deliver, by mail or personal delivery, the petition and the certificate to the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 166.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35052.

At the next regular meeting following the delivery by the county elections official of the petition and the certificate to the secretary of the district, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution reciting the delivery of the petition and certificate and specifying that all future elections in the district shall be conducted as a resident voting district, rather than a landowner voting district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 167.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35053.

The secretary of the district shall file with the county elections official of each county in which any portion of the district is located, a certified copy of the resolution. The secretary shall cause a copy of the resolution to be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation used for the publication of district notices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 168.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35054.

After adoption of the resolution by the board of directors, all elections within the district for elective offices, bonds, or other purposes shall be conducted under laws relating to resident voting districts and all provisions of this article shall prevail over any contrary provisions in this division relating to landowner voting districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35055.

All directors thereafter elected shall be residents of the district, and shall be registered voters at the time of their election and during their term of office. Such directors need not be landowners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35056.

(a) After the establishment of a resident voting district, the provisions set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 35025) of this chapter are no longer applicable. The board of directors may at any time establish divisions within the district.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (c) applies to districts in which directors are elected by divisions.

(c) The board of directors shall, by
 resolution, adjust the boundaries of any divisions pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 435, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

35057.

At the first election of directors following the adoption of the resolution by the board establishing a resident voting district, the number of directors to be elected shall correspond with the number of directors whose terms expire. The directors whose terms have not expired shall serve their unexpired terms under the qualifications to hold office that existed prior to the adoption of the resolution establishing a resident voting district. In such first election and in all subsequent elections, the form of the ballot and the conduct of the election shall be governed by the Uniform District Election Law for resident voting districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35058.

The adoption, in accordance with the provisions of this article, of a resolution changing the method of voting shall in no way invalidate any act of the district, its directors, officers, and employees, made or performed while the district was operating as a landowner voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35059.

Any bonds of the district, authorized or issued in any manner provided by law, and any proceedings taken by the district in connection therewith, prior to the adoption of the resolution changing the method of voting, shall not be affected by such resolution, and the bonds shall continue to be legally authorized or issued bonds. Bonds of the district to which this section is applicable shall include, but not be limited to, any of the following:

(a) Bonds authorized pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35150) of this part.

(b) Bonds
 authorized on behalf of an improvement district pursuant to Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 36410) of Part 6 of this division.

(c) Bonds authorized pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 36250) of Part 6 of this division.

(d) Bonds, including additional bonds, authorized pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35950) of Part 6 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

35060.

After establishment of a resident voting district, the provisions of Sections 35305 and 35306 shall no longer be applicable. The board of directors may at any time alter, repeal, or amend the bylaws by a majority vote. Any alteration, repeal, or amendment to the bylaws shall be recorded with the county recorder of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Procedure [35100. - 35125.]



  ARTICLE 1. Conduct of Elections [35100. - 35111.]

35100.

District elections shall be conducted in conformity with the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) and any provisions of law generally applicable to districts organized under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 243.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35106.

This section shall apply only to landowner voting districts. The ballots used at any general district election in a landowner voting district, including bond elections, shall be provided by the county elections official pursuant to the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) and shall be in the following form:

(a) Each ballot shall have a perforated line across the top portion of the ballot two inches down and parallel to the top thereof. From this perforated line to the top of the ballot a vertical perforated line shall be placed in the center of the ballot.

(b) Above the perforated line and on both sides of the vertical perforation the ballot shall be printed with the name of the district, the date of the election and the ballot number. All ballots shall be numbered consecutively starting with number one.

(c) Above the perforated line and to the left of the vertical perforation shall be printed: “Number of votes entitled to cast:”.

(d) Below the perforated line the following shall be printed in the order enumerated:

(1) The name of the district and the date of the election.

(2) “Number of votes entitled to cast:”.

(3) A solid black line. Immediately under the line shall be printed: “Fold bottom of ballot up to this line.”

(4) The names of the candidates, in accordance with the randomized alphabet as provided for in Section 13112 of the Elections Code.

(5) Any propositions, including authorizations to issue bonds, or other matters to be submitted to the voters.

(e) Appropriate squares shall be placed after each candidate and proposition on the right side of the ballot.

(f) Appropriate voting instructions may be placed on the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 244.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35107.

This section shall apply only to landowner voting districts. The following procedures shall be used at the polls by the precinct board appointed pursuant to Section 12286 of the Elections Code:

(a) A roster of voters shall be kept by a member of the precinct board. Each qualified voter who votes shall sign the roster opposite his or her name.

(b) Any voter holding a proxy or authority of legal representative shall deliver it to the judge for inspection. If the proxy or authority is valid, the voter shall sign his or her own name followed by the word “proxy” or “authority” in the roster opposite the name of the person giving the proxy or the authority.

(c) A voter list of all persons eligible to vote shall be kept by a member of the precinct board. This list shall contain an alphabetical list of eligible voters indicating the number of votes each may cast. The list shall have an appropriate blank space for inserting the ballot number issued to each voter to the right of the number of votes to be cast, a blank space for inserting the number of votes cast by each voter, and a blank space to insert the roster line number of the voter’s signature to the left of the printed name of the voter.

(d) As each voter signs the roster, the member of the precinct board keeping the voter list of persons casting ballots shall announce the number of votes the voter is entitled to cast. A member of the precinct board shall insert in ink or indelible pencil in both spaces on each voter’s ballot the number of votes the voter is entitled to cast on that ballot. A member of the precinct board shall then place the number of that ballot on the voter list and shall also insert the roster line number of the voter’s signature and the number of votes cast in the appropriate spaces.

(e) The ballot and the ballot number shall be checked by a member of the precinct board for accuracy. Any errors shall be corrected and initialed by that member.

(f) The ballot shall be folded by a member of the precinct board by placing the bottom of the ballot on the line marked for that purpose. The ballot shall be refolded by placing the folded bottom on the line marked for folding so that the ballot is folded twice.

(g) The portion of the ballot above the perforated line and to the left of the vertical perforation shall be removed by a member of the precinct board. If a proxy or authority of legal representative is being voted, the proxy or authority shall be attached to the ballot slip.

(h) A member of the precinct board shall hand the folded ballot to the voter who shall take it into a voting booth which shall be so constructed as to insure privacy. The booth shall be provided with a rubber cross stamp and ink pad. The ballot shall be marked only with the rubber stamp by the voter.

(i) After voting the voter shall refold the ballot and deliver it to a member of the precinct board who shall examine only that portion of the ballot that is exposed above the fold line and check that the number of votes marked on the ballot corresponds with the number of votes on the ballot slip of that ballot. Any error in the number of votes shall be corrected by that member in ink or indelible pencil and initialed by two members of the precinct board. The remaining portion of the ballot above the perforated line, shall be removed and delivered to the voter. The folded ballot shall be placed into the ballot box. The ballot box shall be kept locked while the polls are open.

(j) The precinct board shall file as a part of the election records required by Section 10545 of the Elections Code the ballot slip and any proxy or authority of legal representative attached thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 245.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35110.

As soon as the result of the canvass by the county elections official is declared, the county elections official shall prepare and mail to the board of supervisors the statement prescribed in Section 10550 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 246.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35111.

Within 10 days from the receipt by the board of supervisors of the certificate showing the results of the election, the clerk of the board of supervisors shall certify as a true copy and record with the county recorder of each affected county a copy of that certificate.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 35113 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 288.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contest of Elections [35125. - 35125.]

35125.

Any person interested may commence the contest of a district election, other than a general district election, within 20 days after the result has been declared by filing a complaint in the superior court of the county where the election was held. If no contest is commenced within that time the declaration of the result by the board of election is final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Bond Elections [35150. - 35155.1.]

35150.

After a plan of irrigation works has been adopted pursuant to Section 35950, the board shall, by a resolution adopted and entered in its minutes, order a special election to submit to the voters a proposal of whether or not bonds in an amount specified in the order calling the election shall be authorized when either:

(a) The board determines that the bonds should be issued.

(b) The board receives a petition requesting the issuance of bonds signed by persons holding title to a majority in area of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35151.

Notice of a bond election shall be published once a week for four weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county. Proof of publication shall be filed with the secretary prior to the day of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35152.

Notice of a bond election shall specify:

(a) The time and place of the election.

(b) The purpose of the election.

(c) The amount and type of bonds proposed to be issued.

(d) The maximum interest rate to be paid.

(e) The purpose of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

35152.5.

All district bond elections, after having been called and noticed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be held and conducted in the manner provided for general district elections of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

35153.

The ballots cast at a bond election shall specify the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

35154.

If revenue bonds are proposed to be issued, the ballots cast at a bond election shall contain a statement to the effect that the bonds shall be revenue bonds payable solely from the revenues of the district or a designated portion thereof, and that whether or not all of the revenues of the district are to be applied to the bonds, the bonds shall never be a lien or charge upon any land or other property in the district, and no tax or assessment shall ever be levied or collected to pay principal or interest on the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35155.

The board may, by resolution, at such time or times as it deems proper, provide for the issuance of all or any part of the bonds if:

(a) At an election to determine whether general obligation bonds should be issued two-thirds of the votes cast favor the issuance of the bonds.

(b) At an election to determine whether revenue bonds should be issued a majority of the votes cast favor the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

35155.1.

The board may divide the principal amount of any issue into two or more series and fix different dates for the bonds of each series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Method of Elections for the Irvine Ranch Water District [35175. - 35184.]

35175.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to the manner in which elections are conducted in the Irvine Ranch Water District. For purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Irvine Ranch Water District. In all other respects, the district shall continue to be operated, managed, and governed as a California water district in accordance with this division and other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35176.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or the bylaws of the district, all elections held after the effective date of this section within the district shall be conducted as resident voter elections in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require resident voter approval of bonds where voter approval is not required under the statutory or constitutional provisions in effect prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35177.

Qualified voters of the district shall be residents of and registered voters in the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35178.

All directors elected after the effective date of this chapter shall be residents of and registered voters in the district and shall be registered voters at the time of their election and during their term of office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.

District elections shall be conducted in conformance with the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) and the laws generally applicable to districts created and operated pursuant to this division, except as follows:

(a) As permitted by Section 1304 of the Elections Code, the general district election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of every even-numbered year.

(b) As permitted by Section 10555 of the Elections Code, the general district election shall be consolidated with the statewide election in accordance with Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(c) Those directors whose terms of office expire on the last Friday in June of 1984 shall, instead, continue in their offices until the last Friday in November of 1984, and those directors whose terms of office expire on the last Friday in June of 1986 shall, instead, continue in their offices until the last Friday in November of 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 247.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.5.

If a vacancy in the office of the director is filled by appointment, and the vacancy occurred on a date so that, under Section 1780 of the Government Code, there is required to be an election at the next general district election to fill the balance of the unexpired term, then, notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 1780 of the Government Code, the person elected shall serve for a full four-year term, if the terms of office of the directors would continue to be staggered at each subsequent general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 682, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35180.

Directors of the district shall be elected on an at-large basis. Newly elected directors shall take office on the last Friday in November next following the general district election. The term of office of each director shall be four years and each director shall hold office until his successor qualifies and takes office. The terms of office of directors shall continue to be staggered to keep as nearly equal as practicable the number of directors to be elected at each subsequent general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35181.

In order to facilitate an orderly transition to resident voter elections in June of even-numbered years and to preserve staggered terms, the terms of office of directors serving on the effective date of this section shall be modified in accordance with this section. At the 1980 general district election, two directors shall be elected to fill the positions of the two directors who were elected by landowner vote. At the 1982 general district election three directors shall be elected to fill the positions of the other three directors. In order to coincide with these election dates the terms of office of directors shall be extended or shortened as follows:

(a) The terms of office of the two directors elected by landowner vote shall expire in June of 1980.

(b) The terms of the two directors elected in November of 1979 shall expire in June of 1982.

(c) The term of the director elected by resident vote in November of 1977 shall be extended to June of 1982. This extension is deemed to be a portion of the original term.

Each director shall hold office until a successor qualifies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35182.

After the 1980 general district election and the seating of the newly elected directors, the board of directors of the district may increase the number of directors pursuant to Section 34708. If the number of directors is increased, the term of office of new directors shall be determined so as to be consistent with the provisions of this chapter and the requirements of Section 34708. Expansion of the board of directors shall not affect the manner of electing directors at large as provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35183.

The provisions of this chapter shall in no way invalidate any act of the district, its directors, officers and employees, made or performed while the district was operating as a landowner voting district or while the district was following the alternative voting procedures previously set forth in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35184.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect any acts or proceedings heretofore taken for the authorization, issuance, or sale of any bonds of the district, in any manner provided by law, prior to the effective date of this chapter. Nor shall anything in this chapter affect the ability of the district to sell and issue any bond heretofore authorized. This section shall be applicable to any bonds of an improvement district thereof. For the purposes of this chapter, “bonds” shall include notes and other evidences of indebtedness of the district or any improvement district thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Method of Elections for the Moulton-Niguel Water District [35185. - 35195.]

35185.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to the Moulton-Niguel Water District. For purposes of this chapter “district” means the Moulton-Niguel Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35186.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or the bylaws of the district, all elections held after the effective date of this chapter within the district, including elections for directors and elections which are required by law to authorize any special taxes or bonded indebtedness, except special taxes or bonded indebtedness of an uninhabited improvement district, shall be conducted as resident voter elections in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. As used in this chapter, “uninhabited improvement district” means an improvement district having 12 or less registered voters residing therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35187.

Qualified voters within the district shall be residents of and registered voters in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35188.

All directors elected after the effective date of this chapter shall be residents of the district and shall be registered voters at the time of their election and during their term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35189.

Directors of the district shall be elected on an at-large basis unless the board of directors determines that directors shall be elected by divisions. The term “by divisions,” as used in this chapter, means the election of directors by voters of the division alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35190.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors may at any time establish divisions within the district in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If the board of directors decides to establish divisions, the following shall apply:
